test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-maken_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
# Orthographic variation in marking of long vowels

  Verb - maken: # Verb 'to make / to do' - full paradigm
     maken+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: make
     maken+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: maakst
     maken+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maakt
     maken+V+Ind+Prs+Pl: [maket, maken]

     maken+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: maakde
     maken+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: maakdest
     maken+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: maakde
     maken+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: maakden

     maken+V+Inf:  maken
     maken+V+PrfPrc:  maked
     maken+V+PrsPrc:  maken

     maken+V+Imprt+Sg2:  maak
     maken+V+Imprt+Pl2:  maket
